Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-261
School lands; acquisition by Game and Parks Commission; procedure; approval by Governor.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized to acquire title by condemnation to not more than one section or six hundred forty acres of educational lands in any calendar year for parks, recreation areas, or wildlife management areas, or any combination of these uses. The commission shall employ the procedure set forth in sections 72-213 to 72-224 to acquire such title, except that the determination of the value of the lands to be acquired shall be in the manner provided by section 72-224.03 and the value of any leasehold interests to be acquired shall be determined as provided by section 72-224.02. The Governor shall approve all such acquisitions as provided in section 37-303.

Laws 1935, c. 81, § 1, p. 270;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-243;

R.S.1943, § 72-261;

Laws 1963, c. 420, § 1, p. 1346;

Laws 1965, c. 433, § 3, p. 1382;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 407.